Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB262.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 62BEXTREME RISK PROTECTION ORDERSSec.62B01. Definitions.62B02. Petition for order.62B03. Procedure.62B04. Ex parte orders.62B05. Service of orders.62B06. Termination and renewal of orders.62B07. Surrender of firearms.123456789101112131415161718 62B08. Return and disposal of firearms.62B09. Reporting of orders.62B10. Penalties.62B11. Other authority retained.62B12. Immunity.62B13. Instructional and informational material.62B14. Registry.§ 62B01. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Extreme risk protection order." An ex parte order or a final order granted under this chapter."Family or household member." A spouse or person who has been a spouse, person living as a spouse or who lived as a spouse, parent or child, other person related by consanguinity or affinity, current or former sexual or intimate partner or person who shares biological parenthood."Firearm." The term shall have the same meaning given to it under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6111(f) (relating to sale or transfer of firearms)."Firearm license." A license issued under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6109 (relating to licenses)."Foreign extreme risk protection order." An extreme risk protection order issued in the United States or its possessions."Minor court." A magisterial district judge or a judge of the Philadelphia Municipal Court, commissioner appointed under section 1123 (relating to jurisdiction and venue), master appointed under section 1126 (relating to masters) or master for emergency relief.20250SB0262PN0214 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Petitioner." A person who petitions for an order under this chapter."Respondent." A person who is identified as the respondent in a petition filed under this chapter.§ 62B02. Petition for order.(a) Establishment of action.--(1) An action known as a petition for an extreme risk protection order is established.(2) A petition for an extreme risk protection order may be filed by:(i) a family or household member of the respondent; or(ii) a law enforcement officer or agency.(3) An action under this chapter must be filed in the county where the petitioner resides or the county where the respondent resides.(b) Contents of petition.--A petition shall:(1) Allege that the respondent poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to self or others by having in the respondent's custody or control, purchasing, possessing or receiving a firearm and be accompanied by an affidavit made under oath stating the specific statements, actions or facts that give rise to a reasonable belief of future dangerous acts by the respondent.(2) Identify the number, types and locations of the firearms the petitioner reasonably believes to be in the respondent's current ownership, possession, custody or control.(3) Identify whether there is a known existing protection order governing the respondent under any other 20250SB0262PN0214 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicable statute.(4) Identify whether there is a pending lawsuit, complaint, petition or other action between the parties to the petition under the laws of this Commonwealth.(c) Effect of existing orders and pending actions.--(1) The prothonotary shall verify the terms of any existing order governing the parties.(2) The court may not delay granting relief because of the existence of a pending action between the parties or the necessity of verifying the terms of an existing order.(3) A petition for an extreme risk protection order may be granted whether or not there is a pending action between the parties.(d) Notice to family and household members.--(1) If the petitioner is a law enforcement officer or agency, the petitioner shall make a good faith effort to provide notice to a family or household member of the respondent and to any known third party who may be at risk of violence.(2) The notice shall state that the petitioner intends to petition the court for an extreme risk protection order or has already done so and include referrals to appropriate resources, including mental health, domestic violence and counseling resources.(3) The petitioner shall attest in the petition to having provided the notice or attest to the steps that will be taken to provide the notice.(e) Omission of petitioner's address.--(1) If the petition states that disclosure of the petitioner's address would risk harm to the petitioner or a 20250SB0262PN0214 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 family or household member of the petitioner, the petitioner's address may be omitted from all documents filed with the court.(2) If the petitioner has not disclosed an address under this subsection, the petitioner shall designate an alternative address at which the respondent may serve notice of any motions. If the petitioner is a law enforcement officer or agency, the address of record shall be that of the law enforcement agency.(f) Fees and bonds prohibited.--(1) No fees for filing or service of process may be charged by a court or any public agency to a petitioner seeking relief under this chapter. The petitioner shall be provided the necessary number of certified copies, forms and instructional brochures free of charge.(2) A person may not be required to post a bond to obtain relief in any proceeding under this section.(g) Jurisdiction.--(1) The courts of common pleas have jurisdiction over proceedings under this chapter and minor courts have limited jurisdiction over issuance and enforcement of ex parte extreme risk protection orders issued under this chapter.(2) If the notice and order are not served on the respondent in time for the full hearing, the issuing court has concurrent jurisdiction with the court to extend the ex parte extreme risk protection order.§ 62B03. Procedure.(a) Hearing.--Upon receipt of the petition, the court shall order a hearing to be held not later than 14 days from the date of the order and shall issue a notice of hearing to the 20250SB0262PN0214 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 respondent.(b) Service on respondent.--(1) The prothonotary shall cause a copy of the notice of hearing and petition to be forwarded on or before the next judicial day to the appropriate law enforcement agency for service upon the respondent.(2) Personal service of the notice of hearing and petition shall be made upon the respondent by a law enforcement officer not less than five business days prior to the hearing.(c) Ex parte orders.--The court may, as provided in section 62B04 (relating to ex parte orders), issue an ex parte extreme risk protection order pending the hearing ordered under subsection (a). An ex parte order shall be served concurrently with the notice of hearing and petition.(d) Findings by court.--Upon hearing the matter, if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the respondent poses a significant danger of causing injury to self or others by having in the respondent's custody or control, purchasing, possessing or receiving a firearm, the court shall issue an extreme risk protection order that is effective for a period of one year.(e) Evidence.--In determining whether grounds for an extreme risk protection order exist, the court may consider any relevant evidence, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(1) A recent act or threat of violence or injury by the respondent against self or others, whether or not the violence or threat of violence involves a firearm.(2) A pattern of acts or threats of violence or injury by the respondent within the past 12 months, including, but 20250SB0262PN0214 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not limited to, acts or threats of violence by the respondent against self or others.(3) A dangerous mental health issue of the respondent.(4) A violation by the respondent of a protection order issued under Chapter 62A (relating to protection of victims of sexual violence or intimidation) or 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse).(5) A previous or existing extreme risk protection order issued against the respondent.(6) A violation of a previous or existing extreme risk protection order issued against the respondent.(7) A conviction of the respondent for a crime that involves domestic violence.(8) The respondent's ownership, access to or intent to possess firearms.(9) The unlawful or reckless use, display or brandishing of a firearm by the respondent.(10) The history of use, attempted use or threatened use of physical force by the respondent against another person or the respondent's history of stalking another person.(11) A prior arrest of the respondent for an offense graded as a felony, crime of violence or personal injury crime.(12) Corroborated evidence of the abuse of controlled substances or alcohol by the respondent.(13) Evidence of recent acquisition of a firearm by the respondent.(f) Authority of court.--The court may:(1) Examine under oath the petitioner, the respondent and witnesses or, in lieu of examination, consider a sworn 20250SB0262PN0214 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 affidavit of the petitioner, the respondent and witnesses.(2) Review the criminal history records related to the respondent.(3) Review all records relating to the respondent under the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act.(4) During the hearing, consider whether a mental health evaluation or chemical dependency evaluation is appropriate, and order the evaluation if appropriate.(g) Contents of order.--An extreme risk protection order shall include the following:(1) A statement of the grounds supporting the issuance of the order.(2) The date and time the order was issued.(3) The date and time the order expires.(4) Whether a mental health evaluation or chemical dependency evaluation of the respondent is required to be completed.(5) The address of the court in which a responsive pleading may be filed.(6) A description of the requirements for relinquishment of firearms under this chapter.(7) The following statement:To the subject of this protection order: This order will last until the date and time noted above. If you have not done so already, you must surrender to the (insert name of local law enforcement agency) all firearms in your custody, control or possession and the firearm license issued to you immediately. You may not have in your custody or control, purchase, 20250SB0262PN0214 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 possess, receive or attempt to purchase or receive a firearm while this order is in effect. You have the right to request a hearing to terminate this order every 12-month period that this order is in effect, starting from the date of this order and continuing through any renewal. You may seek the advice of an attorney as to any matter connected with this order.(h) Notice relating to termination hearing.--When the court issues an extreme risk protection order, the court shall inform the respondent that the respondent may request termination of the order in the manner prescribed in this chapter. The court shall provide the respondent with a form to request a termination hearing.(i) Reasons for denial of order.--If the court denies an extreme risk protection order, the court shall state the particular reasons for the court's denial.§ 62B04. Ex parte orders.(a) Extreme risk protection order.--Upon the filing of a petition under section 62B02 (relating to petition for order), a petitioner may request that an ex parte extreme risk protection order be issued before a hearing for an extreme risk protection order, without notice to the respondent, by including in the petition detailed allegations based on personal knowledge that the respondent poses an imminent and significant danger of causing injury to self or others by having in the respondent's custody or control, purchasing, possessing or receiving a firearm.(b) Grounds to issue.--If a court finds by clear and convincing evidence that there is reasonable cause to believe that the respondent poses an imminent and significant danger of 20250SB0262PN0214 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 causing injury to self or others by having in the respondent's custody or control, purchasing, possessing or receiving a firearm, the court shall issue an ex parte extreme risk protection order.(c) Hearings.--(1) The court shall hold an ex parte extreme risk protection order hearing on the day the petition is filed or on the judicial day immediately following the day the petition is filed.(2) In accordance with this chapter, the court shall schedule a hearing within 14 days of the issuance of an ex parte extreme risk protection order to determine if a one-year extreme risk protection order is issued under this chapter.(d) Contents of order.--An ex parte extreme risk protection order shall include:(1) A statement of the grounds for the order.(2) The date and time the order was issued.(3) The date and time the order expires.(4) The address of the court in which a responsive pleading may be filed.(5) The date and time of the scheduled hearing.(6) A description of the requirements for surrender of firearms under this chapter.(7) The following statement:To the subject of this protection order: This order is valid until the date and time noted above. You are required to surrender all firearms in your custody, control or possession. You may not have in your custody or control or you may not purchase, possess, 20250SB0262PN0214 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 receive or attempt to purchase or receive a firearm while this order is in effect. You must surrender to the (insert name of local law enforcement agency) all firearms in your custody, control or possession and the firearm license issued to you immediately. A hearing will be held on the date and at the time noted above to determine if an extreme risk protection order should be issued. Failure to appear at that hearing may result in a court making an order against you that is valid for one year. You may seek the advice of an attorney as to any matter connected with this order.(e) Expiration of order.--An ex parte extreme risk protection order under section 62B03 (relating to procedure) shall expire upon the date of the entry of an extreme risk protection order.(f) Service of order.--An ex parte extreme risk protection order shall be served by a law enforcement officer in the same manner as provided for in this chapter for service of the notice of hearing and petition and shall be served concurrently with the notice of hearing and petition.(g) Reasons for denial of order.--If the court denies an ex parte extreme risk protection order, the court shall state the particular reasons for the court's denial.§ 62B05. Service of orders.An extreme risk protection order issued under this chapter shall be served as provided under section 62B04 (relating to ex parte orders) upon the respondent, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, as follows:(1) The law enforcement agency with jurisdiction in the 20250SB0262PN0214 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipality in which the respondent resides shall serve the respondent personally.(2) If the law enforcement agency cannot complete service on the respondent within 10 days, the law enforcement agency shall notify the petitioner. The petitioner shall provide information sufficient to permit the notification.(3) If an order entered by the court recites that the respondent appeared in person before the court, the necessity for further service shall be waived and proof of service of that order shall not be necessary.(4) Returns of service under this chapter shall be made in accordance with the applicable court rule.§ 62B06. Termination and renewal of orders.(a) Procedure to terminate.--(1) The respondent may submit a written request for a hearing to terminate an extreme risk protection order issued under this chapter every 12-month period that the order is in effect, starting from the date of the order and continuing through any renewal.(2) Upon receipt of the request for a hearing to terminate an extreme risk protection order, the court shall set a date for a hearing. Notice of the request shall be served on the petitioner in accordance with this chapter. The hearing shall occur no sooner than 14 days and no later than 30 days from the date of service of the request upon the petitioner.(3) The respondent shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the respondent does not pose a significant danger of causing injury to self or others by having in the respondent's custody or control, or by the 20250SB0262PN0214 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 respondent purchasing, possessing or receiving, a firearm. The court may consider any relevant evidence, including evidence of the considerations specified in this chapter for the issuance of an order.(4) If the court finds after the hearing that the respondent has met the respondent's burden of proof, the court shall terminate the order.(b) Notice to petitioner.--The court shall notify the petitioner of the impending expiration of an extreme risk protection order. Notice shall be received by the petitioner 90 days before the date the order expires.(c) Motion to renew.--(1) A family or household member of a respondent or a law enforcement officer or agency may by motion request a renewal of an extreme risk protection order at any time within 90 days before the expiration of the order.(2) Upon receipt of the motion to renew, the court shall order that a hearing be held not later than 14 days from the date the order issues.(3) The respondent shall be personally served in the same manner prescribed by section 62B05 (relating to service of orders).(4) In determining whether to renew an extreme risk protection order issued under this subsection, the court shall consider all relevant evidence presented by the petitioner and follow the same procedure as provided in this chapter for issuance of an order.(5) (i) If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the requirements for issuance of an extreme risk protection order continue to be met, the court shall 20250SB0262PN0214 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renew the order.(ii) If, after notice, the motion for renewal is uncontested and the petitioner seeks no modification of the order, the order may be renewed on the basis of the petitioner's motion or affidavit stating that there has been no material change in relevant circumstances since entry of the order and stating the reason for the requested renewal.(6) The renewal of an extreme risk protection order shall be for one year, subject to termination as provided in subsection (a) or further renewal by order of the court.§ 62B07. Surrender of firearms.(a) Court order.--Upon issuance of an extreme risk protection order under this chapter, including an ex parte extreme risk protection order, the court shall order the respondent to surrender to the local law enforcement agency all firearms in the respondent's custody, control or possession and a firearm license issued under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6109 (relating to licenses).(b) Duties of law enforcement officers.--(1) The law enforcement officer serving an extreme risk protection order under this chapter, including an ex parte extreme risk protection order, shall request that the respondent immediately surrender all firearms in the respondent's custody, control or possession and the firearm license and conduct any search permitted by law for firearms.(2) The law enforcement officer shall take possession of all firearms belonging to the respondent that are surrendered, in plain sight or discovered from a lawful search.20250SB0262PN0214 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) If personal service by a law enforcement officer is not possible, or not required because the respondent was present at the extreme risk protection order hearing, the respondent shall surrender the firearms in a safe manner to the control of the local law enforcement agency within 48 hours of being served with the order by alternate service or within 48 hours of the hearing at which the respondent was present and ordered to surrender all firearms and the firearm license.(4) At the time of surrender, the law enforcement officer taking possession of firearms and the firearm license shall issue a receipt identifying all firearms that have been surrendered and provide a copy of the receipt to the respondent. Within 72 hours after service of the order, the law enforcement officer serving the order shall file the original receipt with the court and shall ensure that the appropriate law enforcement agency retains a copy of the receipt.(c) Effect of failure to complete.--(1) Upon the sworn statement or testimony of the petitioner or of any law enforcement officer alleging that the respondent has failed to comply with the surrender of firearms as required by an order issued under this chapter, the court shall determine whether probable cause exists to believe that the respondent has failed to surrender all firearms in the respondent's possession, custody or control.(2) If probable cause exists, the court shall issue a warrant describing the firearms and authorizing a search of the locations where the firearms are reasonably believed to be and the seizure of firearms discovered from the search.20250SB0262PN0214 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Other persons who are lawful owners.--If a person other than the respondent claims title to a firearm surrendered under this section, and the person is determined by the law enforcement agency to be the lawful owner of the firearm, the firearm shall be returned to the person, provided that:(1) The firearm is removed from the respondent's custody, control or possession and the person agrees to store the firearm in a manner such that the respondent does not have access to or control of the firearm.(2) The firearm is not otherwise unlawfully possessed by the person.(3) The person is informed and acknowledges that providing a firearm to the respondent for whom an order is issued under this chapter commits an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms) if the person returns the firearm to the possession of the respondent.(e) Firearm surrender hearing.--(1) Upon the issuance of a one-year extreme risk protection order, the court shall order a new hearing date and require the respondent to appear not later than three business days from the issuance of the order.(2) The court shall require a showing that the person subject to the order has surrendered all firearms in the person's custody, control or possession.(3) The court may dismiss the hearing upon a satisfactory showing that the respondent is in compliance with the order.(f) Duty of Pennsylvania State Police.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall develop policies and procedures for use by 20250SB0262PN0214 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 all law enforcement agencies within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection regarding the acceptance, storage and return of firearms required to be surrendered under this chapter.§ 62B08. Return and disposal of firearms.(a) Return of surrendered firearm and license.--If an extreme risk protection order is terminated or expires without renewal, a law enforcement agency holding a firearm and firearm license that has been surrendered under this chapter shall return a surrendered firearm and firearm license requested by a respondent only after confirming:(1) Through a background check, that the respondent is currently eligible to own or possess firearms under Federal and State law.(2) With the court that the extreme risk protection order has terminated or has expired without renewal.(b) Notice to family and household members.--A law enforcement agency shall, if requested, provide prior notice of the return of a firearm to a respondent to family or household members of the respondent in the manner provided by law.(c) Disposal.--A firearm that is surrendered by a respondent under this chapter and remains unclaimed by the lawful owner shall be disposed of in accordance with the law enforcement agency's policies and procedures for the disposal of firearms in police custody.§ 62B09. Reporting of orders.(a) Duties of clerk of court and law enforcement agency.--(1) The clerk of court shall enter an extreme risk protection order or ex parte extreme risk protection order issued under this chapter into a Statewide judicial 20250SB0262PN0214 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information system on the same day the order is issued.(2) The clerk of court shall forward a copy of an order issued under this chapter the same day the order is issued to the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the order.(3) The clerk of court shall forward a copy of the order to the Pennsylvania State Police for entry in the Pennsylvania Instant Check System.(4) Upon receipt of the copy of the order, the law enforcement agency shall enter the order into the national instant criminal background check system, any other Federal or State computer-based system used by law enforcement or others to identify prohibited purchasers of firearms and any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this Commonwealth used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants.(5) The order shall remain in each system for the period stated in the order and the law enforcement agency shall only expunge orders from the systems that have expired or terminated.(6) Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order.(7) The order shall be fully enforceable in any county in this Commonwealth.(b) Termination order.--If an extreme risk protection order is terminated before its expiration date, the clerk of court shall forward the same day a copy of the termination order to the Pennsylvania State Police and the appropriate law enforcement agency specified in the termination order. Upon 20250SB0262PN0214 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall promptly remove the order from any computer-based system in which the order was entered under this section.§ 62B10. Penalties.A person who:(1) Files a petition under this chapter knowing the information in the petition to be materially false, or with intent to harass the respondent, commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) Has in the person's custody or control, or purchases, possesses or receives, a firearm with knowledge that the person is prohibited from doing so by an order issued under this chapter commits a misdemeanor of the first degree and is prohibited from having in the person's custody or control, or purchasing, possessing or receiving or attempting to purchase or receive a firearm for a period of five years from the date the existing order expires.§ 62B11. Other authority retained.This chapter does not affect the ability of a law enforcement officer to remove a firearm or firearm license from a person or conduct a search and seizure for firearms under other lawful authority.§ 62B12. Immunity.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impose criminal or civil liability on any person or entity for acts or omissions related to obtaining an extreme risk protection order or ex parte extreme risk protection order, including, but not limited to, reporting, declining to report, investigating, declining to investigate, filing or declining to file a petition under this chapter.20250SB0262PN0214 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 62B13. Instructional and informational material.(a) Access to information.--The Office of Attorney General shall develop and prepare instructions and informational brochures, standard petitions and extreme risk protection order forms and a staff handbook on the extreme risk protection order process. The following apply:(1) The standard petition and order forms must be used for all petitions filed and orders issued under this chapter.(2) The instructions, brochures, forms and handbook shall be prepared in consultation with interested persons, including representatives of gun violence prevention groups, judges and law enforcement personnel. Materials shall be based on best practices and available electronically online to the public.(3) The instructions shall be designed to assist petitioners in completing the petition and include a sample of a standard petition and order for protection forms.(4) The instructions and standard petition shall include a means for a petitioner to identify, with only lay knowledge, the firearms the respondent may own, possess, receive or have in the respondent's custody or control. The instructions shall provide pictures of types of firearms that a petitioner may choose from to identify the relevant firearms or an equivalent means to allow a petitioner to identify firearms without requiring specific or technical knowledge regarding firearms.(5) The informational brochure shall describe the use of and the process for obtaining, modifying and terminating an extreme risk protection order under this chapter and provide relevant forms.20250SB0262PN0214 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) The extreme risk protection order form shall include, in a conspicuous location, notice of criminal penalties resulting from violation of the order and the following statement:You have the sole responsibility to avoid or refrain from violating this order's provisions. Only the court can change the order and only upon written application.(7) The staff handbook shall allow for the addition of a community resource list by the clerk of court. All clerks of court may create a community resource list of crisis intervention, mental health, substance abuse, interpreter, counseling and other relevant resources serving the county in which the court is located. The clerk of court may make the community resource list available as part of or in addition to the informational brochure described in this subsection.(8) The Office of Attorney General shall distribute a master copy of the petition and order forms, instructions and informational brochures to all clerks of court and shall distribute a master copy of the petition and order forms to all superior, district and municipal courts. Distribution of all documents shall, at a minimum, be in an electronic format or formats accessible to all courts and clerks of court in this Commonwealth.(9) The Office of Attorney General shall determine the significant non-English-speaking or limited-English-speaking populations in this Commonwealth. The administrator shall then arrange for translation of the instructions and informational brochures required by this section, which shall contain a sample of the standard petition and order for 20250SB0262PN0214 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protection forms, into the languages spoken by those significant non-English-speaking populations and shall distribute a master copy of the translated instructions and informational brochures to all clerks of court within one year of the effective date of this paragraph.(b) Updates.--The Office of Attorney General shall update the instructions, brochures, standard petition and extreme risk protection order forms and staff handbook as necessary, including when changes in the law make an update necessary.§ 62B14. Registry.(a) Duties of Pennsylvania State Police.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall establish a Statewide registry of extreme risk protection orders and shall maintain a complete and systematic record and index of all valid ex parte and final extreme risk protection orders filed under subsection (b). The Statewide registry shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:(1) The names of the petitioner and any other protected party.(2) The name and address of the respondent.(3) The relationship between the petitioner and the respondent.(4) The date the order was entered.(5) The date the order expires.(6) The relief granted under this chapter.(7) The judicial district in which the order was entered.(8) Where furnished, the Social Security number and date of birth of the respondent.(9) Whether or not a firearm and firearm license were 20250SB0262PN0214 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ordered to be relinquished.(b) Duty of prothonotary.--(1) The prothonotary shall send, on a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police, a copy of the extreme risk protection order to the Statewide registry of extreme risk protection orders so that the copy of the extreme risk protection order is received within 24 hours of the entry of the order. An amendment to or revocation of an order shall be transmitted by the prothonotary within 24 hours of the entry of the order for modification or revocation.(2) The Pennsylvania State Police shall enter orders, amendments and revocations in the Statewide registry of extreme risk protection orders within eight hours of receipt.(3) Terminated orders shall be purged from the registry.(c) Availability.--(1) The registry of the Pennsylvania State Police shall be available at all times to inform courts, dispatchers and law enforcement officers of a valid extreme risk protection order involving a respondent.(2) When an order granting relief has been entered by a court, the information shall be available to the Pennsylvania State Police for the purpose of conducting a criminal history records check in compliance with the applicable provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 Subch. A (relating to Uniform Firearms Act).(3) Information contained in the Statewide registry shall not be subject to access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(d) Information concerning crimes of violence.--Each law enforcement agency shall transmit to the Pennsylvania State 20250SB0262PN0214 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Police, in a manner prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police, the information specified in subsection (a) related to crimes of violence between family or household members.(e) Annual report.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall annually compile and analyze the incident report data received and publish a Statewide report that includes aggregate, county and municipal statistical profiles. The Pennsylvania State Police shall transmit a copy of the annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly.(f) Enforcement of foreign extreme risk protection orders.--(1) All foreign extreme risk protection orders shall have the presumption of validity in this Commonwealth, and law enforcement officers shall make arrests for violations of foreign extreme risk protection orders in the same manner as applicable to violations of extreme risk protection orders issued within this Commonwealth. Until a foreign order is declared to be invalid by a court, the foreign order shall be enforced by all law enforcement personnel in this Commonwealth.(2) A law enforcement officer shall rely upon a copy of a foreign extreme risk protection order that has been presented to the law enforcement officer by any source and may verify the existence of an extreme risk protection order consistent with this chapter. The fact that a foreign extreme risk protection order has not been filed with a prothonotary or entered into the Pennsylvania State Police registry shall not be grounds for law enforcement to refuse enforcement of the order.(g) Immunity.--The following entities shall be immune from civil liability for good faith conduct in an action arising in 20250SB0262PN0214 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 connection with a court's finding that the foreign order is invalid or unenforceable:(1) Law enforcement agencies and their agents and employees.(2) County correctional and detention facilities and their agents and employees.(3) Prothonotaries and their agents and employees.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0262PN0214 - 25 - 12345678